Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5155.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 317. (1) Second degree murder?All other kinds of murder shall be murder of the second degree, and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for life, or any term of years, in the discretion of the court trying the same. (2) Duress is not a defense to a prosecution under this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.